Maine, session 132, LD1093.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §1804, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Signage for parks. Ensure that only land classified as a park under subsection
2 is designated as a park and that land designated as a park is designated by appropriate
signage and public information, including, but not limited to, promotional materials,
brochures and exhibits;
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §1809 is enacted to read:
§1809. Nonstate parks
A nonstate park may not use the term "state park" in its name.
For purposes of this section, "nonstate park" means land not classified as a state park
as provided in section 1804, subsection 2.
Sec. 3. Review of public land signage. The Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of Parks and Lands shall review signage and public
information, including, but not limited to, promotional materials for all land under the
control of the State to ensure these lands are designated by appropriate signage and public
information pertaining to these lands is clear.
Sec. 4. Clarification of nonstate park status. The Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of Parks and Lands shall develop and provide rules,
procedures and deadlines to those entities that use the term "state park" that are not state
parks to ensure that public materials are labeled in a way that reflects the park's status as a
nonstate park, including signage and road sign colors, and those materials must contain a
notice that tickets and passes sold by a nonstate park are not transferable to state parks.